Oklahoma, session 2026, SB138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 2004, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2022 (12 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 2004), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2004.


PROCESS


A. SUMMONS: ISSUANCE. Upon filing of the petition, the clerk


shall forthwith issue a summons. Upon request of the plaintiff


separate or additional summons shall issue against any defendants.


B. SUMMONS: FORM.


1. The summons shall be signed by the clerk, be under the seal


of the court, contain the name of the court and the names of the

Req. No. 473 Page 1


parties, be directed to the defendant, state the name and address of


the plaintiff’s attorney, if any, otherwise, the plaintiff’s


address, and the time within which these rules require the defendant


to appear and defend, and shall notify the defendant that in case of


failure to appear, judgment by default will be rendered against the


defendant for the relief demanded in the petition.


2. A judgment by default shall not be different in kind from or


exceed in amount that prayed for in either the demand for judgment


or in cases not sounding in contract in a notice which has been


given the party against whom default judgment is sought. Except as


to a party against whom a judgment is entered by default, every


final judgment shall grant the relief to which the party in whose


favor it is rendered is entitled, even if the party has not demanded


such relief in his or her pleadings.


C. BY WHOM SERVED: PERSON TO BE SERVED.


1. SERVICE BY PERSONAL DELIVERY.


a. At the election of the plaintiff, process, other than


a subpoena, shall be served by a sheriff or deputy


sheriff, a person licensed to make service of process


in civil cases or a person specially appointed for


that purpose. The court shall freely make special


appointments to serve all process, other than a


subpoena, under this paragraph.



Req. No. 473 Page 2


b. A summons to be served by the sheriff or deputy


sheriff shall be delivered to the sheriff by the court


clerk or an attorney of record for the plaintiff.


When a summons, subpoena or other process is to be


served by the sheriff or deputy sheriff of another


county, the court clerk shall mail it, together with


the voucher of the court clerk for the fees collected


for the service, to the sheriff of that county. The


sheriff shall deposit the voucher in the Sheriff’s


Service Fee Account created pursuant to Section 514.1


of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The sheriff or


deputy sheriff shall serve the process in the manner


that other process issued out of the court of the


sheriff’s own county is served. A summons to be


served by a person licensed to make service of process


in civil cases or by a person specially appointed for


that purpose shall be delivered by an attorney of


record for the plaintiff to such person.


c. Service shall be made as follows:


(1) upon an individual other than an infant who is


less than fifteen (15) years of age or an


incompetent person, by delivering a copy of the


summons and of the petition personally or by


leaving copies thereof at the person’s dwelling

Req. No. 473 Page 3


house or usual place of abode with some person


then residing therein who is fifteen (15) years


of age or older, by delivering a copy of the


summons and of the petition to an agent


authorized by appointment or by law to receive


service of process, or by delivering a copy of


the summons and of the petition personally or by


leaving copies thereof at an agreed meeting place


with some person then residing at the person’s


dwelling house or usual place of abode,


(2) upon an infant who is less than fifteen (15)


years of age, by serving the summons and petition


personally and upon either of the infant’s


parents or guardian, or if they cannot be found,


then upon the person having the care or control


of the infant or with whom the infant lives; and


upon an incompetent person by serving the summons


and petition personally and upon the incompetent


person’s guardian,


(3) upon a domestic or foreign corporation or upon a


partnership or other unincorporated association


which is subject to suit under a common name, by


delivering a copy of the summons and of the


petition to an officer, a managing or general

Req. No. 473 Page 4


agent or to any other agent authorized by


appointment or by law to receive service of


process and, if the agent is one authorized by


statute to receive service and the statute so


requires, by also mailing a copy to the


defendant,


(4) upon the United States or an officer or agency


thereof in the manner specified by Federal Rule


of Civil Procedure 4,


(5) upon a state, county, school district, public


trust or municipal corporation or other


governmental organization thereof subject to


suit, by delivering a copy of the summons and of


the petition to the officer or individual


designated by specific statute; however, if there


is no statute, then upon the chief executive


officer or a clerk, secretary or other official


whose duty it is to maintain the official records


of the organization,


(6) upon an inmate incarcerated in an institution


under the jurisdiction and control of the


Department of Corrections, by delivering a copy


of the summons and of the petition to the warden


or superintendent or the designee of the warden

Req. No. 473 Page 5


or superintendent of the institution where the


inmate is housed. It shall be the duty of the


receiving warden or superintendent or a designee


to promptly deliver the summons and petition to


the inmate named therein. The warden or


superintendent or his or her designee shall


reject service of process for any inmate who is


not actually present in the institution, and


(7) upon an inmate incarcerated in a county jail or


detention center under the jurisdiction and


control of the county sheriff or the jail trust


of the county, by delivering a copy of the


summons and of the petition to the jail or


detention center administrator or the designee of


such administrator of the jail or detention


center where the inmate is housed. It shall be


the duty of the receiving jail or detention


center administrator or designee to promptly


deliver the summons and petition to the inmate


named therein. The jail or detention center


administrator or designee shall reject service of


process for any inmate who is not actually


present in the jail or detention center.


2. SERVICE BY MAIL.

Req. No. 473 Page 6


a. At the election of the plaintiff, a summons and


petition may be served by mail by the plaintiff’s


attorney, any person authorized to serve process


pursuant to subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of this


subsection or by the court clerk upon a defendant of


any class referred to in division (1), (3) or (5) of


subparagraph c of paragraph 1 of this subsection.


Service by mail shall be effective on the date of


receipt or if refused, on the date of refusal of the


summons and petition by the defendant.


b. Service by mail shall be accomplished by mailing a


copy of the summons and petition by certified mail,


return receipt requested and delivery restricted to


the addressee. When there is more than one defendant,


the summons and a copy of the petition or order shall


be mailed in a separate envelope to each defendant.


If the summons is to be served by mail by the court


clerk, the court clerk shall enclose the summons and a


copy of the petition or order of the court to be


served in an envelope, prepared by the plaintiff,


addressed to the defendant, or to the resident service


agent if one has been appointed. The court clerk


shall prepay the postage and mail the envelope to the


defendant, or service agent, by certified mail, return

Req. No. 473 Page 7


receipt requested and delivery restricted to the


addressee. The return receipt shall be prepared by


the plaintiff. Service by mail to a garnishee shall


be accomplished by mailing a copy of the summons and


notice by certified mail, return receipt requested,


and at the election of the judgment creditor by


restricted delivery, to the addressee.


c. Service by mail shall not be the basis for the entry


of a default or a judgment by default unless the


record contains a return receipt showing acceptance by


the defendant or a returned envelope showing refusal


of the process by the defendant. Acceptance or


refusal of service by mail by a person who is fifteen


(15) years of age or older who resides at the


defendant’s dwelling house or usual place of abode


shall constitute acceptance or refusal by the party


addressed. In the case of an entity described in


division (3) of subparagraph c of paragraph 1 of this


subsection, acceptance or refusal by any officer or by


any employee of the registered office or principal


place of business who is authorized to or who


regularly receives certified mail shall constitute


acceptance or refusal by the party addressed. A


return receipt signed at such registered office or

Req. No. 473 Page 8


principal place of business shall be presumed to have


been signed by an employee authorized to receive


certified mail. In the case of a state municipal


corporation, or other governmental organization


thereof subject to suit, acceptance or refusal by an


employee of the office of the officials specified in


division (5) of subparagraph c of paragraph 1 of this


subsection who is authorized to or who regularly


receives certified mail shall constitute acceptance or


refusal by the party addressed. If delivery of the


process is refused, upon the receipt of notice of such


refusal and at least ten (10) days before applying for


entry of default, the person elected by plaintiff


pursuant to subparagraph a of this paragraph to serve


the process shall mail to the defendant by first-class


mail a copy of the summons and petition and a notice


prepared by the plaintiff that despite such refusal


the case will proceed and that judgment by default


will be rendered against him or her unless he or she


appears to defend the suit. Any default or judgment


by default shall be set aside upon motion of the


defendant in the manner prescribed in Section 1031.1


of this title, or upon petition of the defendant in


the manner prescribed in Section 1033 of this title if

Req. No. 473 Page 9


the defendant demonstrates to the court that the


return receipt was signed or delivery was refused by


an unauthorized person. A petition shall be filed


within one (1) year after the defendant has notice of


the default or judgment by default but in no event


more than two (2) years after the filing of the


judgment.


3. SERVICE BY ELECTRONIC MEANS.


a. Upon a court order or if a copy of the summons and


petition cannot be personally delivered after three


attempts to the named defendant as specified in


paragraph 1 of this subsection, a summons may be


served by electronic means, and by thereafter mailing


a copy of the summons and the petition by certified


mail, postage prepaid to the named defendant at the


last-known address. Service of a summons in such


manner shall be deemed complete on the day of receipt


of the electronic transmission and mailing. A summons


and petition may be served by electronic means by the


plaintiff’s attorney or any person authorized to serve


process pursuant to subparagraph a of paragraph 1 of


this subsection upon a defendant of any class referred


to in division (1), (3), or (5) of subparagraph c of


paragraph 1 of this subsection. Service by electronic

Req. No. 473 Page 10


means shall be effective on the date of receipt or, if


refused, on the date of refusal of the summons and


petition by the defendant.


b. Service by electronic means shall be accomplished by


sending an electronic notification to the named


defendant via electronic mail. The electronic


notification shall advise the named defendant of the


nature of the communication and shall include a


hyperlink to a secure application that tracks and


provides evidence of whether the electronic mail


notification was bounced back, returned, received, or


opened, and whether a copy of the summons was viewed


or downloaded by the named defendant. The secure


application shall give the named defendant the option


of accepting the service by electronically signing an


acknowledgement of receipt in the application or the


option of declining the service. When there is more


than one defendant, the summons and a copy of the


petition or order shall be transmitted in a separate


electronic mail notification to each defendant.


Service by electronic mail to a garnishee shall be


accomplished by transmitting via a secure application


a copy of the summons and notice, return receipt



Req. No. 473 Page 11


requested, and at the election of the judgment


creditor, to the addressee.


c. Service by electronic means shall not be the basis for


the entry of a default or a judgment by default unless


the record contains evidence showing acceptance by the


defendant or a returned electronic mail showing


refusal of the process by the defendant. Acceptance


or refusal of service by electronic means by a person


who is fifteen (15) years of age or older who resides


at the defendant’s dwelling house or usual place of


residence shall constitute acceptance or refusal by


the party addressed. In the case of an entity


described in division (3) of subparagraph c of


paragraph 1 of this subsection, acceptance or refusal


by any officer or by any employee of the registered


office or principal place of business who is


authorized to or who regularly receives electronic


mail shall constitute acceptance or refusal by the


party addressed. A return receipt electronic mail


sent from such registered office or principal place of


business shall be presumed to have been sent by an


employee authorized to send electronic mail. In the


case of a state municipal corporation or other


governmental organization subject to suit, acceptance

Req. No. 473 Page 12


or refusal by an employee of the office of the


officials specified in division (5) of subparagraph c


of paragraph 1 of this subsection who is authorized to


or who regularly receives electronic mail shall


constitute acceptance or refusal by the party


addressed. If delivery of the process is refused,


upon the receipt of notice of such refusal and at


least ten (10) days before applying for entry of


default, the person elected by the plaintiff pursuant


to subparagraph a of this paragraph to serve the


process shall send an electronic notification via


electronic mail to the defendant that includes a copy


of the summons and petition and a notice prepared by


the plaintiff that despite such refusal the case will


proceed and that judgment by default will be rendered


against him or her unless he or she appears to defend


the action. Any default or judgment by default shall


be set aside upon motion of the defendant in the


manner prescribed in Section 1031.1 of this title, or


upon petition of the defendant in the manner


prescribed in Section 1033 of this title if the


defendant demonstrates to the court that the return


receipt electronic mail was sent, or delivery was


refused by an unauthorized person. A petition shall

Req. No. 473 Page 13


be filed within one (1) year after the defendant


receives notice of the default or judgment by default


but in no event more than two (2) years after the


filing of the judgment.


4. SERVICE BY PUBLICATION.


a. Service of summons upon a named defendant may be made


by publication when it is stated in the petition,


verified by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney


or in a separate affidavit by the plaintiff or the


plaintiff’s attorney filed with the court, that with


due diligence service cannot be made upon the


defendant by any other method.


b. Service of summons upon the unknown successors of a


named defendant, a named decedent or a dissolved


partnership, corporation or other association may be


made by publication when it is stated in a petition,


verified by the plaintiff or the plaintiff’s attorney


or in a separate affidavit by the plaintiff or the


plaintiff’s attorney filed with the court, that the


person who verified the petition or the affidavit does


not know and with due diligence cannot ascertain the


following:





Req. No. 473 Page 14


(1) whether a person named as defendant is living or


dead, and, if dead, the names or whereabouts of


the person’s successors, if any,


(2) the names or whereabouts of the unknown


successors, if any, of a named decedent,


(3) whether a partnership, corporation or other


association named as a defendant continues to


have legal existence or not; or the names or


whereabouts of its officers or successors,


(4) whether any person designated in a record as a


trustee continues to be the trustee; or the names


or whereabouts of the successors of the trustee,


or


(5) the names or whereabouts of the owners or holders


of special assessment or improvement bonds, or


any other bonds, sewer warrants or tax bills.


c. Service pursuant to this paragraph shall be made by


publication of a notice, signed by the court clerk,


one (1) day a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in


a newspaper authorized by law to publish legal notices


which is published in the county where the petition is


filed. If no newspaper authorized by law to publish


legal notices is published in such county, the notice


shall be published in some such newspaper of general

Req. No. 473 Page 15


circulation which is published in an adjoining county.


All named parties and their unknown successors who may


be served by publication may be included in one


notice. The notice shall state the court in which the


petition is filed and the names of the plaintiff and


the parties served by publication, and shall designate


the parties whose unknown successors are being served.


The notice shall also state that the named defendants


and their unknown successors have been sued and must


answer the petition on or before a time to be stated


(which shall not be less than forty-one (41) days from


the date of the first publication), or judgment, the


nature of which shall be stated, will be rendered


accordingly. If jurisdiction of the court is based on


property, any real property subject to the


jurisdiction of the court and any property or debts to


be attached or garnished must be described in the


notice.


(1) When the recovery of money is sought, it is not


necessary for the publication notice to state the


separate items involved, but the total amount


that is claimed must be stated. When interest is


claimed, it is not necessary to state the rate of


interest, the date from which interest is claimed

Req. No. 473 Page 16


or that interest is claimed until the obligation


is paid.


(2) It is not necessary for the publication notice to


state that the judgment will include recovery of


costs in order for a judgment following the


publication notice to include costs of suit.


(3) In an action to quiet title to real property, it


is not necessary for the publication notice to


state the nature of the claim or interest of


either party, and in describing the nature of the


judgment that will be rendered should the


defendant fail to answer, it is sufficient to


state that a decree quieting plaintiff’s title to


the described property will be entered. It is


not necessary to state that a decree forever


barring the defendant from asserting any interest


in or to the property is sought or will be


entered if the defendant does not answer.


(4) In an action to foreclose a mortgage, it is


sufficient that the publication notice state that


if the defendant does not answer, the defendant’s


interest in the property will be foreclosed. It


is not necessary to state that a judgment forever


barring the defendant from all right, title,

Req. No. 473 Page 17


interest, estate, property and equity of


redemption in or to the property or any part


thereof is requested or will be entered if the


defendant does not answer.


d. Service by publication is complete when made in the


manner and for the time prescribed in subparagraph c


of this paragraph. Service by publication shall be


proved by the affidavit of any person having knowledge


of the publication. No default judgment may be


entered on such service until proof of service by


publication is filed with and approved by the court.


e. Before entry of a default judgment or order against a


party who has been served solely by publication under


this paragraph, the court shall conduct an inquiry to


determine whether the plaintiff, or someone acting in


behalf of the plaintiff, made a distinct and


meaningful search of all reasonably available sources


to ascertain the whereabouts of any named parties who


have been served solely by publication under this


paragraph. Before entry of a default judgment or


order against the unknown successors of a named


defendant, a named decedent or a dissolved


partnership, corporation or association, the court


shall conduct an inquiry to ascertain whether the

Req. No. 473 Page 18


requirements described in subparagraph b of this


paragraph have been satisfied.


f. A party against whom a default judgment or order has


been rendered, without other service than by


publication in a newspaper, may, at any time within


three (3) years after the filing of the judgment or


order, have the judgment or order set aside in the


manner prescribed in Sections 1031.1 and 1033 of this


title. Before the judgment or order is set aside, the


applicant shall notify the adverse party of the


intention to make an application and shall file a full


answer to the petition, pay all costs if the court


requires them to be paid and satisfy the court by


affidavit or other evidence that during the pendency


of the action the applicant had no actual notice


thereof in time to appear in court and make a defense.


The title to any property which is the subject of and


which passes to a purchaser in good faith by or in


consequence of the judgment or order to be opened


shall not be affected by any proceedings under this


subparagraph. Nor shall proceedings under this


subparagraph affect the title of any property sold


before judgment under an attachment. The adverse


party, on the hearing of an application to open a

Req. No. 473 Page 19


judgment or order as provided by this subparagraph,


shall be allowed to present evidence to show that


during the pendency of the action the applicant had


notice thereof in time to appear in court and make a


defense.


g. The term “successors” includes all heirs, executors,


administrators, devisees, trustees and assigns,


immediate and remote, of a named individual,


partnership, corporation or association.


h. Service outside of the state does not give the court


in personal jurisdiction over a defendant who is not


subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this


state or who has not, either in person or through an


agent, submitted to the jurisdiction of the courts of


this state.


4. 5. SERVICE ON THE SECRETARY OF STATE.


a. Service of process on a domestic or foreign


corporation may be made by serving the Secretary of


State as the corporation’s agent, if:


(1) there is no registered agent for the corporation


listed in the records of the Secretary of State,


or


(2) neither the registered agent nor an officer of


the corporation could be found at the registered

Req. No. 473 Page 20


office of the corporation, when service of


process was attempted.


b. Before resorting to service on the Secretary of State


the plaintiff must have attempted service either in


person or by mail on the corporation at:


(1) the corporation’s last-known address shown on the


records of the Franchise Tax Division of the


Oklahoma Tax Commission, if any is listed there,


and


(2) the corporation’s last-known address shown on the


records of the Secretary of State, if any is


listed there, and


(3) the corporation’s last address known to the


plaintiff.


If any of these addresses are the same, the plaintiff


is not required to attempt service more than once at


any address. The plaintiff shall furnish the


Secretary of State with a certified copy of the return


or returns showing the attempted service.


c. Service on the Secretary of State shall be made by


filing two (2) copies of the summons and petition with


the Secretary of State, notifying the Secretary of


State that service is being made pursuant to the


provisions of this paragraph, and paying the Secretary

Req. No. 473 Page 21


of State the fee prescribed in paragraph 7 of


subsection A of Section 1142 of Title 18 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, which fee shall be taxed as part of


the costs of the action, suit or proceeding if the


plaintiff shall prevail therein. If a registered


agent for the corporation is listed in the records of


the Secretary of State, the plaintiff must also


furnish a certified copy of the return showing that


service on the registered agent has been attempted


either in person or by mail, and that neither the


registered agent nor an officer of the corporation


could be found at the registered office of the


corporation.


d. Within three (3) working days after receiving the


summons and petition, the Secretary of State shall


send notice by letter, certified mail, return receipt


requested, directed to the corporation at its


registered office or the last-known address found in


the office of the Secretary of State, or if no address


is found there, to the corporation’s last-known


address provided by the plaintiff. The notice shall


enclose a copy of the summons and petition and any


other papers served upon the Secretary of State. The


corporation shall not be required to serve its answer

Req. No. 473 Page 22


until forty (40) days after service of the summons and


petition on the Secretary of State.


e. Before entry of a default judgment or order against a


corporation that has been served by serving the


Secretary of State as its agent under this paragraph,


the court shall determine whether the requirements of


this paragraph have been satisfied. A default


judgment or order against a corporation that has been


served only by service on the Secretary of State may


be set aside upon motion of the corporation in the


manner prescribed in Section 1031.1 of this title, or


upon petition of the corporation in the manner


prescribed in Section 1033 of this title, if the


corporation demonstrates to the court that it had no


actual notice of the action in time to appear and make


its defense. A petition shall be filed within one (1)


year after the corporation has notice of the default


judgment or order but in no event more than two (2)


years after the filing of the default judgment or


order.


f. The Secretary of State shall maintain an alphabetical


record of service setting forth the name of the


plaintiff and defendant, the title, docket number and


nature of the proceeding in which the process has been

Req. No. 473 Page 23


served upon the defendant, the fact that service has


been effected pursuant to the provisions of this


paragraph, the return date thereof and the date when


the service was made. The Secretary of State shall


not be required to retain this information for a


period longer than five (5) years from receipt of the


service of process.


g. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to a


foreign insurance company doing business in this


state.


5. 6. SERVICE BY ACKNOWLEDGMENT. An acknowledgment on the back


of the summons or the voluntary appearance of a defendant is


equivalent to service.


6. 7. SERVICE BY OTHER METHODS. If service cannot be made by


personal delivery or, by mail, or by secured electronic means, a


defendant of any class referred to in division (1) or (3) of


subparagraph c of paragraph 1 of this subsection may be served as


provided by court order in a manner which is reasonably calculated


to give the defendant actual notice of the proceedings and an


opportunity to be heard and upon filing an affidavit by the


plaintiff or plaintiff’s attorney that with due diligence service


cannot otherwise be made upon the defendant.


7. 8. NO SERVICE BY PRISONER. No prisoner in any jail,


Department of Corrections facility, private prison, or parolee or

Req. No. 473 Page 24


probationer under supervision of the Department of Corrections shall


be appointed by any court to serve process on any defendant, party


or witness.


D. SUMMONS AND PETITION. The summons and petition shall be


served together. The plaintiff shall furnish the person making


service with such copies as are necessary. The failure to serve a


copy of the petition with the summons is not a ground for dismissal


for insufficiency of service of process, but on motion of the party


served, the court may extend the time to answer or otherwise plead.


If a summons and petition are served by personal delivery, the


person serving the summons shall state on the copy that is left with


the person served the date that service is made. This provision is


not jurisdictional, but if the failure to comply with it prejudices


the party served, the court, on motion of the party served, may


extend the time to answer or otherwise plead.


E. SUMMONS: TERRITORIAL LIMITS OF EFFECTIVE SERVICE.


1. Service of the summons and petition may be made anywhere


within this state in the manner provided by subsection C of this


section.


2. When the exercise of jurisdiction is authorized by


subsection F of this section, service of the summons and petition


may be made outside this state:


a. by personal delivery in the manner prescribed for


service within this state,

Req. No. 473 Page 25


b. in the manner prescribed by the law of the place in


which the service is made for service in that place in


an action in any of its courts of general


jurisdiction,


c. in the manner prescribed by paragraph 2 of subsection


C of this section,


d. as directed by the foreign authority in response to a


letter rogatory,


e. in the manner prescribed by paragraph 3 4 of


subsection C of this section only when permitted by


subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 3 4 of subsection C


of this section, or


f. as directed by the court.


3. Proof of service outside this state may be made in the


manner prescribed by subsection G of this section, the order


pursuant to which the service is made, or the law of the place in


which the service is made for proof of service in an action in any


of its courts of general jurisdiction.


4. Service outside this state may be made by an individual


permitted to make service of process under the law of this state or


under the law of the place in which the service is made or who is


designated to make service by a court of this state.


5. When subsection C of this section requires that in order to


effect service one or more designated individuals be served, service

Req. No. 473 Page 26


outside this state under this section must be made upon the


designated individual or individuals.


6. a. A court of this state may order service upon any


person who is domiciled or can be found within this


state of any document issued in connection with a


proceeding in a tribunal outside this state. The


order may be made upon application of any interested


person or in response to a letter rogatory issued by a


tribunal outside this state and shall direct the


manner of service.


b. Service in connection with a proceeding in a tribunal


outside this state may be made within this state


without an order of court.


c. Service under this paragraph does not, of itself,


require the recognition or enforcement of an order,


judgment or decree rendered outside this state.


F. ASSERTION OF JURISDICTION. A court of this state may


exercise jurisdiction on any basis consistent with the Constitution


of this state and the Constitution of the United States.


G. RETURN.


1. The person serving the process shall make proof of service


thereof to the court promptly and in any event within the time


during which the person served must respond to the process, but the



Req. No. 473 Page 27


failure to make proof of service does not affect the validity of the


service.


2. When process has been served by a sheriff or deputy sheriff


and return thereof is filed in the office of the court clerk, a copy


of the return shall be sent by the court clerk to the plaintiff’s


attorney within three (3) days after the return is filed. If


service is made by a person other than a sheriff or deputy sheriff,


the licensed process server shall make affidavit thereof. The


return shall set forth the county of issuance, the name of the


person served and the date, place and method of service.


3. If service was by mail, the person mailing the summons and


petition shall endorse on the copy of the summons or order of the


court that is filed in the action the date and place of mailing and


the date when service was receipted or service was rejected, and


shall attach to the copy of the summons or order a copy of the


return receipt or returned envelope, if and when received, showing


whether the mailing was accepted, refused or otherwise returned. If


the mailing was refused, the return shall also show the date and


place of any subsequent mailing pursuant to paragraph 2 of


subsection C of this section. When the summons and petition are


mailed by the court clerk, the court clerk shall notify the


plaintiff’s attorney within three (3) days after receipt of the


returned card or envelope showing that the card or envelope has been


received.

Req. No. 473 Page 28


4. If service was by secured electronic means, the person


sending the summons and petition by electronic mail shall endorse on


the copy of the summons or order of the court that is filed in the


action the date and place of mailing and the date when service was


receipted or service was rejected, and shall attach to the copy of


the summons or order a copy of the return receipt electronic mail,


if and when received, showing whether the electronic mail was


accepted, refused, or otherwise returned. If the electronic mail


was refused, the return shall also show the date and place of any


subsequent electronic mail pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection C


of this section. When the summons and petition are sent by


electronic mail by the court clerk, the court clerk shall notify the


plaintiff’s attorney within three (3) days after the return receipt


electronic mail was received.


H. AMENDMENT. At any time in its discretion and upon such


terms as it deems just, the court may allow any process or proof of


service thereof to be amended, unless it clearly appears that


material prejudice would result to the substantial rights of the


party against whom the process issued.


I. SUMMONS: TIME LIMIT FOR SERVICE. If service of process is


not made upon a defendant within one hundred eighty (180) days after


the filing of the petition and the plaintiff has not shown good


cause why such service was not made within that period, the action


shall be deemed dismissed as to that defendant without prejudice and

Req. No. 473 Page 29


Section 100 of this title shall be applicable to any refiling of the


action. Upon application of a defendant not timely served, the


court shall enter an order dismissing the action as to that


defendant. The court shall enter a dismissal order of an action


within two hundred (200) days after the filing of the action in


which no service has been made on any defendant as required pursuant


to this section and such order shall be mailed to the address of the


party or the party’s attorney of record. The action shall not be


dismissed if a summons was served on the defendant within one


hundred eighty (180) days after the filing of the petition and a


court later holds that the summons or its service was invalid.


After a court quashes a summons or its service, a new summons may be


served on the defendant within a time specified by the judge. If


the new summons is not served within the specified time, the action


shall be deemed to have been dismissed without prejudice as to that


defendant. This subsection shall not apply with respect to a


defendant who has been outside of this state for one hundred eighty


(180) days following the filing of the petition.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-473 TEK 12/27/2024 3:45:32 PM







Req. No. 473 Page 30